dev/testp.dix
    <pardef n="ar__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>air</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>airsean</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>air-sean</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>air-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>air-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hair</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hairsean</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hair-sean</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hair-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hair-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uirthi</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uirthise</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uirthi-se</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uirthi-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uirthi-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oraibh</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oraibhse</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oraibh-se</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oraibh-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oraibh-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orainn</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orainne</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ort</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ortsa</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ort-sa</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ort-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ort-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orthu</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orthusan</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orthu-san</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orthu-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orthu-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orm</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ormsa</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orm-sa</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orm-seo</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>orm-sin</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ar</l><r><a/>ar<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ar" a="irishfst"><i/><par n="ar__pr"/></e>
